PRIVACY NOTICE FOR TEACHERS, PARENTS, CARERS AND TUTORS
Last updated: March 2024
About our Privacy Notice
Maths Circle (“
we
” or “
us
“) is committed to protecting and respecting the privacy, safety and security of our registered (and prospective) users, including students, teachers, school administrators and parents (together “
Users
“).
This notice (together with our terms and conditions of use) explains in plain language who we are, how we collect, share and use personal information about you, and how you can exercise your privacy rights whilst using our products. Please read this notice carefully to understand how any personal information is used. If you have any questions or concerns about our use of your personal information, then please contact us using the contact details provided at the bottom of this Privacy Notice.
Depending on the circumstances, we may process Personal Information either as a Service Provider/Processor or as a Controller, as defined in the UK GDPR, EU GDPR and CCPA. Where we provide our services in Australia, we are committed to protecting your privacy in accordance with the Privacy Act (Cth) (“
Privacy Act
“), which includes the Australian Privacy Principles (APPs) and any related privacy codes.
Where we refer to “personal information” in this Privacy Notice, we are referring to any information that is defined as personal information or personal data under the applicable data protection laws.
A child-friendly version of this Privacy Notice is also available on our website.
About Maths Circle
Maths Circle Ltd (Company Number: 09861676) is a UK based company which produces maths resources (both online and paper based programmes) for schools and families across the world. In Australia and New Zealand, our services are provided through our Australia-based subsidiary, Maths Circle Australia Pty Ltd (ABN 33 668 067 329).
We currently have two products; Times Tables Rock Stars and NumBots. Times Tables Rock Stars is a carefully sequenced programme to boost times tables recall and maths confidence (comprising a website, app, worksheets and teacher resources). For more information about Times Tables Rock Stars, please see our website at
ttrockstars.com
(the “
TTRS
Site
“). NumBots is a website and app that helps build an understanding in and recall of addition and subtraction facts. For more information about NumBots, please see our website at
numbots.com
(the “
NumBots Site
“). Other products are in development and this Privacy Notice will be updated as necessary to reflect these as soon as they are available.
Each resource created by Maths Circle, together with the TTRS Site and the NumBots Site and any other website created for national and regional competitions and/or events (together the “
Sites
“), is owned and operated by Maths Circle. References to the Sites in this Privacy Notice therefore includes all related Maths Circle owned websites.
What Personal Information does Maths Circle collect WHEN YOU USE OUR PLATFORMS?
We collect the following categories of personal information:
School Users
In the case of school/educational institution subscriptions (including on a trial basis) (“
School Users
“) we may collect:
School’s name, address (for billing purposes and account name)
Teachers’ names, email addresses (so we can provide you with an account and contact you)
Students’ names, year groups and maths classes (to administer accounts)
Home Users and Tutors
In the case of home or family subscriptions (“
Home Users
“), or tutor subscriptions, we may collect:
Address (for billing purposes)
Parents’/Tutors’ names and email addresses (so we can provide you with an account and contact you)
Children’s names (to administer accounts)
If you contact us
We may also collect details of other interactions that you and/or your Users have with us, together with any other information that you and/or your Users choose to provide us with, for example, through correspondence and interactions with our customer support, finance and technical support teams.
Where we refer to “lawful basis” in this section, this applies to the extent applicable under the relevant data protection laws.
This information is required in order to fulfil our contractual obligations to you as it is necessary to correctly identify each registrant as a site User, manage their account and for other purposes identified below. It is impractical in most circumstances for Users to remain anonymous, as we may not be able to interact with you, provide access to the Sites, or answer your enquiry if we are not able to identify Users or collect your personal information. Users can provide pseudonym or de-identified information for students if they wish, for extra anonymity (for example initials instead of full student names), however this may make administering the platform and monitoring progress more difficult.
Please note that by registering with any of the Sites and providing the requested personal information, whether on a trial, subscription or gifted basis, the School is deemed to have a lawful basis (pursuant to all applicable data protection laws) for supplying such data and information for and on behalf of all Users (to include both teachers and students). It is the school’s responsibility to ensure that they have a sufficient lawful basis for supplying all data to us. Where the lawful basis that the school is relying on is “consent”, it is the School’s responsibility to seek and confirm all necessary parental consent for all students. If a school does not have (or in the future no longer has) a sufficient lawful basis for supplying us with such personal data, any User to which this applies must not use the Sites, and the School must promptly inform us so any relevant data can be deleted from our Sites.
Please note that by registering with either of the Sites and providing the requested personal information, whether on a trial, subscription or gifted basis, the Home User’s or Tutors’ consent to provide us with information for and on behalf of all Users (to include parents, tutors and children) is deemed to be given. Users who do not wish to give this consent must not use the Sites. Where applicable, the Tutor is deemed to have a lawful basis (pursuant to all applicable data protection laws) for supplying such data and information for and on behalf of its tutees. Where the lawful basis that the Tutor is relying on is “consent” under the applicable data protection laws, it is the Tutor’s responsibility to seek and confirm all necessary parental consent for all tutees. If a Tutor does not have (or in the future no longer has) a sufficient lawful basis for supplying us with such personal data, any User to which this applies must not use the Sites, and the Tutor must promptly inform us so any relevant data can be deleted from our Sites.
For the benefit of impact reporting, you may also opt to provide further student details, to include; student’s date of birth and student’s gender, however this information is all entirely optional and not required in order to use the Sites. Some of this optional information may be considered sensitive information or special category data under the applicable data protection laws and therefore subject to greater protection. If we process sensitive information about Users, we will only disclose or use that information with your consent or if another exception applies under the applicable data protection laws.
We do not however collect any unnecessary personal information from Users (for instance, information about religious beliefs, medical history etc). In circumstances where we may receive unsolicited personal information, we will usually destroy or de-identify the information as soon as practicable if it is lawful and reasonable to do so unless the unsolicited personal information is reasonably necessary for, or directly related to, our functions or activities.
Children signing up to our Sites and Consent
Please note that children (under the age of 18 years) cannot register to use the Sites themselves, as they are not lawfully able to agree to our Terms and Conditions. A teacher, tutor, parent or guardian must register for them (either as part of a school subscription, tutor subscription or home subscription) and it is the teacher, tutor, parent or guardian’s responsibility to ensure that any consent to use the Sites has been collected (including on a trial basis).
How does Maths Circle collect Personal Information?
The personal information collected about Users broadly falls into the following categories:
Information that you provide voluntarily
We may obtain personal information directly from you (unless it is unreasonable or impracticable to do so) or from our School Users or Home Users about you and/or other Users voluntarily by filling in forms on our Sites, or by corresponding with us via phone, email or otherwise. This includes information that you provide when you register an account with us, enter a competition or survey, subscribe to marketing communications from us, and/or to submit enquiries to us.
The personal information that you are asked to provide, and the reasons why you are asked to provide it, will be made clear to Users at the point we ask you to provide such personal information.
Information that we collect automatically
When Users visit our Sites, we may collect certain information automatically from their device. In some countries, including countries in the European Economic Area, this information may be considered personal information under applicable data protection laws.
Specifically, the information we collect automatically may include information like a User’s IP address, device type, unique device identification numbers and login information, browser-type and version, time zone setting, operating system and platform, broad geographic location (e.g. country or city-level location) and other technical information. We may also collect information about how a User’s device has interacted with our Sites, including the pages accessed and links clicked, download errors, length of visits to certain pages, page interaction information, and methods used to browse away from any page.
Collecting this information enables us to better understand the Users who come to our Sites, where they come from, and what content on our Sites is of particular interest to them. We use this information for our internal analytics purposes and to improve the quality and relevance of our Sites to our Users.
We will also collect the answers provided by Users to the questions raised on each programme and the length of time taken to respond in each case. This information is required to enable us to provide statistical feedback to teachers and parents on the performance and progress of students, a facility which is an integral part of our products.
Some of this information may be collected using cookies and similar tracking technology, as explained further in our Cookie Policy.
Information that we obtain from third party sources
From time to time, we may receive information about you if you use any of the other Sites that we operate or the other services and products that we provide. In this case we will have informed you when we collected that personal information that it may be shared internally and combined with data collected on the relevant Sites.
From time to time, we may receive personal information about you from third party sources (including for example, distributors, business partners, affiliates, sub-contractors, payment and delivery services, analytics providers, search information providers), but only where we have checked that these third parties either have your consent or are otherwise legally permitted or required to disclose your personal information to us.
What does Maths Circle do with your Personal Information?
The personal information of Users, including any prospective Users, may be used for the following purposes:
To carry out our obligations arising from any contracts entered into between you and us and to provide access to our products and services including the Sites;
To send a confirmation notice to the User of the registration;
To administer and manage accounts, including username and password resetting, responding to enquiries raised by Users, to contact Users about any problems with their accounts, or the use of our products and services, or their conduct on the Sites;
To provide quotes or offers for, and updates about, our products and services;
To calculate the User’s recall speeds;
To provide results data for each User, school class, or school as a whole, including the preparation of statistical reports and data analysis to assist us in enhancing the learning from our Sites;
To provide you with tips on how to use parts of the product or service, information about new features on our Sites;
To notify you about changes, improvements, and upgrades to our products and services and the Sites;
To ensure that content from our Sites is presented in the most effective manner for Users and for their computers or devices;
To keep our Sites safe and secure;
To publish names of winners and high performers on the Sites and send prizes or certificates for progress of Users on the Sites;
To administer our Sites and for internal operations, including troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, research, product development, quality control, statistical and survey purposes;
To send out newsletters and emails about our products and services, including the Sites including information about upcoming events, competitions, and rules of the Sites; and/or
To send you information about third party services that we feel may be of interest to you, but only where we have express or implied consent to contact someone or we are otherwise permitted by law to do so. If you do not want to receive these updates, Users may opt out at any time by following the specific opt out instructions within the communications that we send, or by updating their details on the “My Details” page of our Sites.
Please note that our Sites do not provide students with any means to communicate directly with each other. There are no chat rooms connected with our products and services.
Users are required to choose a “Rock Name” (for Times Tables Rock Stars) or “Bot Name” (for NumBots) which is displayed by default in place of real names at the end of multi-player games, in-school competition results and leaderboards. Students also have the option (in “My Settings”) on Times Tables Rock Stars to appear as “Anonymous” to their classmates for additional privacy, albeit teachers will always have full access to all student data.
Legal basis for Processing Personal Information
Our legal basis for collecting and using the personal information described above will depend on the personal information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it. Ordinarily, we collect personal information from Users either because it is needed to enable us to fulfil and perform our contractual obligations with you as regards the provision of our products and services, and/or where we have the consent of the Users to do so. We may also process personal data where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Who does Maths Circle share my personal information with?
Users have the right to know whether or not their personal data is shared with third parties. We do not have targeted advertising on our platforms and we do not sell Users’ personal data. We will keep personal information confidential and will not knowingly share or divulge Users’ data or information to advertisers or any external third parties, however the following categories of recipients may access, process or be transferred your data:
our
group companies
;
our
sub-contractors
who assist us in making, improving and delivering the Sites (these are notified to Users in advance as are listed in our standard Terms and Conditions, and any material changes to this list are notified to Users by email);
third parties who provide services on our behalf to help with our business activities
(these are notified to Users in advance as are listed in our standard Terms and Conditions, and any material changes to this list are notified to Users by email). These parties are authorised to process your personal information only as necessary to provide these services to us. Such services may include payment processing, providing customer service, sending marketing communications, those who help to enhance the security of our Sites, and those who otherwise process personal information for purposes that are described in this Privacy Notice or notified to you when we collect your personal information.
Government education departments, universities, bodies managing or representing schools, or schools
themselves, to help enhance the learning from our Sites through the preparation of statistical reports and analysis. Any data provided to such establishments for their own analysis will always be provided as aggregated (non-personal) or de-personalised data, in such a way that they are unable to identify any individual child directly or indirectly. It is lawful for us to de-personalise this data as we rely on legitimate interest as our lawful basis to do so under the applicable data protection laws and it is lawful for us to share this de-personalised data and any associated reports as we are not sharing any data that can be identified as personal;
any
competent law enforcement body, regulatory, government agency, court or other third party
where we believe disclosure is necessary (i) as a matter of applicable law or regulation, (ii) to exercise, establish or defend our legal rights, (iii) to enforce our terms and conditions, or (iv) to protect your vital interests or those of any other person;
a
potential buyer
(and its agents and advisers) in connection with any proposed purchase, merger or acquisition of any part of our business, provided that we inform the buyer it must use your personal information only for the purposes disclosed in this Privacy Notice; and/or
any
other person with your consent
to the disclosure, under the applicable data protection laws.
How does Maths Circle keep my personal information secure?
We use appropriate technical and organisational measures to protect the personal information that we collect and process about you whilst you use our products. The
data that we collect from you is stored on secure servers located in Europe through Hetzner, Amazon Web Services and Heroku. The measures we use are designed to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk of processing your personal information. Security measures include data encryption, multi-factor authentication for systems, firewalls, anti-virus malware protection, staff training and security controls over physical access. As part of our privacy compliance processes we regularly review these security procedures to consider appropriate new technology and methods. We also have both UK Cyber Essentials accreditation and UK Cyber Essentials Plus accreditation.
We do not carry paid advertisements on our websites and there are no in-app purchases within our applications. Students are not able to chat or communicate via our platforms. Our platforms do not allow children to publicise their personal information.
We use a third party payment processor, Stripe, to process credit card payments made to us. Transactions are encrypted using SSL technology. We do not retain any credit card numbers ourselves. Stripe’s use of your personal information is governed by their privacy policy, which may be viewed at
https://stripe.com/us/privacy
.
For invoice payments, we use a third party accounting service, FreeAgent, to create and send the invoices. Transactions are encrypted using SSL technology. The information sent to FreeAgent is limited to the billing person’s name and email address, the organisation’s name and postal address and what you’ve ordered. Use of your personal information is governed by FreeAgent’s privacy policy, which may be viewed at
https://www.freeagent.com/website/privacy/
.
We use a third party customer service platform, Intercom, to handle all customer service and finance queries sent to us either via email or via help pop ups within our Sites. Intercom’s use of your personal information is governed by their privacy policy, which may be viewed at https://www.intercom.com/legal/privacy.
For merchandise payments by credit card, we use a third party payment processor, Shopify, to process credit card payments made to us. Transactions are encrypted using secure technology. We do not retain any credit card numbers ourselves. Shopify’s use of your personal information is governed by their privacy policy, which may be viewed at
https://www.shopify.com/legal/privacy
.
You can see a full list of our service providers in our terms and conditions.
You and your students/children are responsible for keeping your passwords confidential. We ask Users not to share their passwords with anyone.
Users should be aware that unfortunately the transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure. Although we will do our best to protect your personal data, we cannot guarantee the security of your data transmitted to our Sites; any transmission is at your own risk. Once we have received your information, we will use strict procedures and security features to try to prevent unauthorised access.
We also expect all our employees and contractors to comply with this Privacy Notice, and we will take appropriate actions to address breaches by employees and contractors of the obligations imposed by this Privacy Notice.
Where we use third party services to run and administer our Sites and our services to you, we will only provide them with the minimal amount of information needed for the purposes of delivering the service to us and to meet our requirements. We always carry out due diligence against all our third-party suppliers for the purposes of ensuring their compliance with data protection, maintaining adequate security of your data and ensuring they apply adequate data protection principles to the processing of the data we supply. We also make sure a legally binding contract (sometimes called a Data Processing Agreement or DPA) is also in place to protect your data.
International Data Transfers
Your personal information may be transferred to, and processed in, countries other than the country in which you are resident. These countries may have data protection laws that are different to the laws of your country. Specifically, our Sites servers are located in Europe through Hetzner, Amazon Web Services and Heroku. The other countries include Europe, UK, Australia and USA, although this list may change from time to time. However, we have taken appropriate safeguards to require that your personal information will remain protected in accordance with this Privacy Notice and application data protection laws.
Data Retention
We retain personal information we collect from Users where we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (for example, to provide you with a service you have requested or to comply with applicable legal, tax or accounting requirements).
When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process User’s personal information, or where you ask us to delete Users’ information, we take reasonable steps to either delete or anonymise it where required under applicable data protection laws. If this is not possible immediately (for example, because your personal information has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store Users’ personal information and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible, but will endeavour to do so as soon as reasonably practicable. It will take up to 10 days to allow for the personal information to be deleted from all our back-up systems. Should we need to recover our services from a backup that would ordinarily contain User’s information and account information that has been deleted, we will use best endeavours to ensure that deleted information is not restored into the live services.
We may also have to retain and use personal information as necessary to comply with our legal and regulatory obligations, to resolve disputes, and to enforce our terms and conditions.
Our policy is to automatically delete all student/child data from school accounts, tutor accounts and family accounts 90 days after expiry of a free trial or expiry of a subscription, where no renewal or pending subscription has been requested by that school, tutor or family to either of our platforms. Please note that subscriptions are not automatically renewed at expiry. The main contact will be notified by us of our deletion policy prior to expiry of the subscription, and again prior to deletion of the student data. Deleted student/child data cannot be retrieved following deletion.
We recommend that schools and tutors delete the student data and accounts once that particular student has left the school or tutor organisation in accordance with the applicable state legislation and data protection laws.
Your Data Protection Rights
Pursuant to UK GDPR, the CCPA, COPPA, VCDPA, the Privacy Act and other applicable state legislation and data protection laws, Users have the data protection rights set out in this section. Please note that your rights may change based on which of the data protection laws are applicable to you. Where there are differences, we have let you know below:
Users have the
right to know
how we process their personal information. This is why we try to maintain transparency about what information we collect and how we use it, as explained elsewhere in this Privacy Notice. These rights can be exercised by contacting us using the contact details provided under the “How to contact us” heading below. Please note Australian Users are informed of these matters through this Privacy Notice.
If a User wishes to
access, correct, update or delete
their personal information, or that of their school (in the case of teachers), they can do so at any time by contacting us using the contact details provided under the “How to contact us” heading below. Users can also delete all of their personal data by navigating to “Subscription Details” and pressing “Delete”.
Parents, guardians and caregivers have the right to
access,
review, correct, update, delete or refuse collection of their child’s personal information
. Please note that these requests are handled together with the child’s school or tutor, unless they are part of a family subscription. This is in line with UK GDPR, COPPA and FERPA. These rights can be exercised by contacting us using the contact details provided under the “How to contact us” heading below.
Parents, guardians and caregivers have the right to
stop the collection and use of their child’s personal information.
Please note that these requests are handled together with the child’s school or tutor, unless they are part of a family subscription. This is in line with UK GDPR, COPPA and FERPA. These rights can be exercised by contacting us using the contact details provided under the “How to contact us” heading below. Please note this does not apply to Australian users.
In addition, Users can
object to processing
of their personal information, ask us to
restrict processing
of their personal information or
request portability
of their personal information. Again, Users can exercise these rights by contacting us using the contact details provided under the “How to contact us” heading below. Please note this does not apply to Australian users.
Users have the right to
opt-out of the sharing of data for targeted marketing communications
we send at any time. Users can exercise this right by either clicking on the “unsubscribe” or “opt-out” link in any marketing e-mails we send, or by updating their details on the “My Details” page of our Sites. Alternatively, Users can contact us using the contact details provided under the “How to contact us” heading below. Please note this does not apply to Australian users.
Users have the right to
opt-out of the sale of their personal data
, however we do not sell the personal data of our Users. If Users have any questions about this they can contact us using the contact details provided under the “How to contact us” heading below. Please note this does not apply to Australian users.
Similarly, if we have collected and process Users’ personal information with their consent, then Users can
withdraw their consent
at any time. Withdrawing consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent. Users can withdraw their consent by contacting us using the contact details provided under the “How to contact us” heading below.
If you want to make a complaint about the way we have processed your personal information or would like to exercise your rights to your personal information with us, we’d rather you brought it to us in the first instance (using the contact details provided under the “How to contact us” heading below), but of course Users have the
right to complain to a data protection authority
. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority. (Contact details for data protection authorities in the European Economic Area, Switzerland and certain non-European countries (including the US and Canada) are available at
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/data-protection/article-29/structure/data-protection-authorities/index_en.htm
and the contact details for the Australia data protection authority (the OAIC) are at
https://www.oaic.gov.au/privacy/privacy-complaints
We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
Updates to this Privacy Notice
We may update this Privacy Notice from time to time in response to changing legal, technical or business developments. We will always inform you by email communication at least one week in advance of any material changes we make to our Privacy Notice. Users may also be advised at point of login to our Sites and platforms. We will obtain your consent to any material Privacy Notice changes if and where this is required by applicable data protection laws. Users will be deemed to have consented to any such changes by their continued use of the Sites following any changes being made.
You can see when this Privacy Notice was last updated by checking the “last updated” date displayed at the top of this Privacy Notice.
How to Contact Us
If you have any questions or concerns about our use of your personal information, please contact our Data Protection Officer using the following details: support@mathscircle.com.
The data controller of your personal information is Maths Circle which is registered with the Information Commissioner’s Office (“ICO”) in the UK with registration number ZA250537.
EU Data Representative
We have also appointed DataRep as our EU and Switzerland Representative. For any enquiries, issues, etc. if you are based within the EU or Switzerland, you can contact them:
DataRep, 77 Camden Street Lower, Dublin, D02 XE80, Ireland
datarequest@datarep.com
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://stripe.com/us/privacy:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connected Account Agreement
Stripe Payments Company Terms
Acquirer Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Cross River Bank
Deutsche Bank
Goldman Sachs Bank USA
PNC Bank
Issuing Bank Terms
Payment Method Terms
User Bank Debit Authorizations
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Other Products and Programs
Stripe Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Terminal Purchase Terms
Stripe Terminal Reseller Terms
Stripe Atlas Agreement
Stripe Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Privacy Shield Policy
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
E-SIGN Disclosure
Licenses
Consumer Terms
Last updated: January 16, 2025
This Privacy Policy includes important information about your personal data and we encourage you to read it carefully.
Welcome
We provide financial infrastructure for the internet. Individuals and businesses of all sizes use our technology and services to facilitate purchases, accept payments, send payouts, and manage online businesses.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes the Personal Data that we collect, how we use and share it, and details on how you can reach us with privacy-related inquiries. The Policy also outlines your rights and choices as a data subject, including the right to object to certain uses of your Personal Data.
Depending on the activity, Stripe assumes the role of a “data controller” and/or “data processor” (or “service provider”). For more details about our privacy practices, including our role, the specific Stripe entity responsible under this Policy, and our legal bases for processing your Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
Defined Terms
In this Policy, “Stripe”, “we”, “our,” or “us” refers to the Stripe entity responsible for the collection, use, and handling of Personal Data as described in this document. Depending on your jurisdiction, the specific Stripe entity accountable for your Personal Data might vary.
Learn More
.
“Personal Data” refers to any information associated with an identified or identifiable individual, which can include data that you provide to us, and that we collect about you during your interaction with our Services (such as device information, IP address, etc.).
“Services” refers to the products, services, devices, and applications, that we provide under the Stripe Services Agreement (“Business Services”) or the Stripe Consumer Terms of Service (“End User Services”); websites (“Sites”) like Stripe.com and Link.com; and other Stripe applications and online services. We provide Business Services to entities (“Business Users”). We provide End User Services directly to individuals for their personal use.
“Financial Partners” are financial institutions, banks, and other partners such as payment method acquirers, payout providers, and card networks that we partner with to provide the Services.
Depending on the context, “you” might be an End Customer, End User, Representative, or Visitor:
End Users.
When you use an End User Service, such as saving a payment method with Link, for personal use we refer to you as an “End User.”
End Customers.
When you are not directly transacting with Stripe, but we receive your Personal Data to provide Services to a Business User, including when you make a purchase from a Business User on a Stripe Checkout page or receive payments from a Business User, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Representatives.
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User—perhaps as a company founder, account administrator for a Business User, or a recipient of an employee credit card from a Business User via Stripe Issuing—we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Visitors.
When you interact with Stripe by visiting a Site without being logged into a Stripe account, or when your interaction with Stripe does not involve you being an End User, End Customer, or Representative, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” For example, you are a Visitor when you send a message to Stripe asking for more information about our Services.
In this Policy, “Transaction Data” refers to data collected and used by Stripe to facilitate transactions you request. Some Transaction Data is Personal Data and may include: your name, email address, contact number, billing and shipping address, payment method information (like credit or debit card number, bank account details, or payment card image chosen by you), merchant and location details, amount and date of purchase, and in some instances, information about what was purchased.
1. Personal Data that we collect and how we use and share it
2. More ways we collect, use and share Personal Data
3. Legal bases for processing data
4. Your rights and choices
5. Security and retention
6. International data transfers
7. Updates and notifications
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
9. Contact us
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
1. Personal Data we collect and how we use and share it
Our collection and use of Personal Data differs based on whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, and the specific Service that you are using. For example, if you're a sole proprietor who wants to use our Business Services, we may collect your Personal Data to onboard your business; at the same time, you might also be an End Customer if you've bought goods from another Business User that is using our Services for payment processing. You could also be an End User if you used our End User Service, such as Link, for those transactions.
1.1 End Users
We provide End User Services when we provide the Services directly to you for your personal use (e.g., Link). Additional details regarding our collection, usage, and sharing of End User Personal Data, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Users
Using Link or Connecting your bank account
. Stripe offers a service called "Link," which allows you to create an account and store information for future interactions with Stripe’s Services and Business Users. You may save a number of different kinds of Personal Data using Link. For instance, you may save your name, payment method details, contact information, and address to conveniently use saved information to pay for transactions across our Business Users. When you choose to pay with Link, we will also collect Transaction Data associated with your transactions.
Learn More
.
You can also share and save bank account details to your Link account using Stripe’s
Financial Connections
product. When you use Financial Connections, Stripe will periodically collect and process your account information (such as bank account owner information, account balances, account number and details, account transactions, and, in some cases, log-in credentials). You can ask us to cease the collection of such data at any time.
Learn More
.
Finally, you can use Link to store your identity documents (such as your driver’s license) so that you can share them in future interactions with Stripe or its Business Users.
Paying Stripe
. When you purchase goods or services directly from Stripe, we receive your Transaction Data. For instance, when you make a payment to Stripe Climate, we collect information about the transaction, as well as your contact and payment method details.
Identity/Verification Services
. We offer an identity verification service that automates the comparison of your identity document (such as a driver’s license) with your image (such as a selfie). You can separately consent to us using your biometric data to enhance our verification technology, with the option to revoke your consent at any time.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Users, including about your online activity and your engagement with our End User Services, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Users
Services
. We use and share your Personal Data to provide the End User Services to you, which includes support, personalization (such as language preferences and setting choices), and communication about our End User Services (such as communicating Policy updates and information about our Services). For example, Stripe may use cookies and similar technologies or the data you provide to our Business Users (such as when you input your email address on a Business User’s website) to recognize you and help you use Link when visiting our Business User’s website. Learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies in Stripe’s
Cookie Policy
.
Our Business Users.
When you use Link to make payments with our Business Users, we share your Personal Data, including name, contact information, payment method details, and Transaction Data with those Business Users.
Learn More
. You can also direct Stripe to share your saved bank account information and identity documents with Business Users you do business with. Once we share your Personal Data with Business Users, we may process that Personal Data as a Data Processor for those Business Users, as detailed in Section 1.2 of this Policy.  You should consult the privacy policies of the Business Users’ you do business with for information on how they use the information shared with them.
Fraud Detection and Loss Prevention
. We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect fraud and prevent financial losses for you, us, and our Business Users and Financial Partners, including detecting unauthorized purchases. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those that use our fraud prevention-related Business Services (such as Stripe Radar), with Personal Data about you (including your attempted transactions) so that they can assess the fraud or loss risk associated with the transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, we may use your Personal Data, including Transaction Data, to assess your eligibility for, and offer you, other End User Services or promote existing End User Services, including through co-marketing with partners such as Stripe Business Users.
Learn more
. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we use and share End User Personal Data with third party partners to allow us to advertise our End User Services to you, including through interest-based advertising, and to track the efficacy of such ads. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third-party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about ways we may use and share End Users' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.2 End Customers
Stripe provides various Business Services to our Business Users, which include processing in-person or online payments or payouts for those Business Users. When acting as a service provider—also referred to as a Data Processor—for a Business User, we process End Customer Personal Data in accordance with our agreement with the Business User and the Business User's lawful instructions. This happens, for example, when we process a payment for a Business User because you purchased a product from them, or when the Business User asks us to send you funds.
Business Users are responsible for ensuring that the privacy rights of their End Customers are respected, including obtaining appropriate consents and making disclosures about their own data collection and use associated with their products and services. If you're an End Customer, please refer to the privacy policy of the Business User you're doing business with for its privacy practices, choices, and controls.
We provide more comprehensive information about our collection, use, and sharing of End Customer Personal Data in our
Privacy Center
, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing your Personal Data.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Customers
Transaction Data
. If you're an End Customer making payments to, receiving refunds or payments from, initiating a purchase or donation, or otherwise transacting with our Business User, whether in-person or online, we receive your Transaction Data. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Learn More
. Additionally, we may collect information entered into a checkout form even if you opt not to complete the form or transaction with the Business User.
Learn More
. A Business User who uses Stripe’s Terminal Service to provide its goods or services to End Customers may use the Terminal Service to collect End Customer Personal Data (like your name, email, phone number, address, signature, or age) in accordance with its own privacy policy.
Identity/Verification Information
. Stripe provides a verification and fraud prevention Service that our Business Users can use to verify Personal Data about you, such as your authorization to use a particular payment method. During the process, you’d be asked to share with us certain Personal Data (like your government ID and selfie for biometric verification, Personal Data you input, or Personal Data that is apparent from the physical payment method like a credit card image). To protect against fraud and determine if somebody is trying to impersonate you, we may cross-verify this data with information about you that we've collected from Business Users, Financial Partners, business affiliates, identity verification services, publicly available sources, and other third party service providers and sources.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Customers, including about your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Customers
To provide our Business Services to our Business Users, we use and share End Customers' Personal Data with them. Where allowed, we also use End Customers' Personal Data for Stripe’s own purposes such as enhancing security, improving and offering our Business Services, and preventing fraud, loss, and other damages, as described further below.
Payment processing and accounting
. We use your Transaction Data to deliver Payment-related Business Services to Business Users — including online payment transactions processing, sales tax calculation, and invoice, bill, and dispute handling — and to help them determine their revenue, settle their bills, and execute accounting tasks.
Learn More
. We may also use your Personal Data to provide and improve our Business Services.
During payment transactions, your Personal Data is shared with various entities in connection with your transaction. As a service provider or data processor, we share Personal Data to enable transactions as directed by Business Users. For instance, when you choose a payment method for your transaction, we may share your Transaction Data with your bank or other payment method provider, including as necessary to authenticate you, Learn More, process your transaction, prevent fraud, and handle disputes. The Business User you choose to do business with also receives Transaction Data and might share the data with others. Please review your merchant’s, bank’s, and payment method provider’s privacy policies for more information about how they use and share your Personal Data.
Financial services
. Certain Business Users leverage our Services to offer financial services to you via Stripe or our Financial Partners. For example, a Business User may issue a card product with which you can purchase goods and services. Such cards could carry the brand of Stripe, the bank partner, and/or the Business User. In addition to any Transaction Data we may generate or receive when these cards are used for purchases, we also collect and use your Personal Data to provide and manage these products, including assisting our Business Users in preventing misuse of the cards. Please review the privacy policies of the Business User and, if applicable, our bank partners associated with the financial service (the brands of which may be shown on the card) for more information.
Identity/Verification services
. We use Personal Data about your identity to perform verification services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are transacting with, to prevent fraud, and to enhance security. For these purposes we may use Personal Data you provide directly or Personal Data we obtain from our service providers, including for phone verification.
Learn More
. If you provide a selfie along with an image of your identity document, we may employ biometric technology to compare and calculate whether they match and verify your identity.
Learn More
.
Fraud detection and loss prevention.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent losses for you, us, our Business Users, and Financial Partners. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those using our fraud prevention-related Business Services, with your Personal Data (including your attempted transactions) to help them assess the fraud or loss risk associated with a transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Our Business Users (and their authorized third parties).
We share End Customers' Personal Data with their respective Business Users and parties directly authorized by those Business Users to receive such data. Here are common examples of such sharing:
When a Business User instructs Stripe to provide another Business User with access to its Stripe account, including data related to its End Customers, via Stripe Connect.
Sharing information that you have provided to us with a Business User so that we can send payments to you on behalf of that Business User.
Sharing information, documents, or images provided by an End Customer with a Business User when the latter uses Stripe Identity, our identity verification Service, to verify the identity of the End Customer.
The Business Users you choose to do business with may further share your Personal Data with third parties (like additional third party service providers other than Stripe). Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
Advertising by Business Users
. If you initiate a purchasing process with a Business User, the Business User receives your Personal Data from us in connection with our provision of Services even if you don't finish your purchase. The Business User may use your Personal Data to market and advertise their products or services, subject to the terms of their privacy policy. Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information, including your rights to stop their use of your Personal Data for marketing purposes.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share End Customers' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.3 Representatives
We collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives of Business Users (for example, business owners) to provide our Business Services. For more information about how we collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives, as well as the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Representatives
Registration and contact information
. When you register for a Stripe account for a Business User (including incorporation of a Business), we collect your name and login credentials. If you register for or attend an event organized by Stripe or sign up to receive Stripe communications, we collect your registration and profile data. As a Representative, we may collect your Personal Data from third parties, including data providers, to advertise, market, and communicate with you as detailed further in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below. We may also link a location with you to tailor the Services or information effectively to your needs.
Learn More
.
Identification Information
. As a current or potential Business User, an owner of a Business User, or a shareholder, officer, or director of a Business User, we need your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address, to fulfill our Financial Partner and regulatory requirements, verify your identity, and prevent fraudulent activities and harm to the Stripe platform. We collect your Personal Data, such as ownership interest in the Business User, date of birth, government-issued identity documents, and associated identifiers, as well as any history of fraud or misuse, directly from you and/or from publicly available sources, third parties such as credit bureaus and via the Services we provide.
Learn More
. You may also choose to provide us with bank account information.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about Representatives, including your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Representatives
We typically use the Personal Data of Representatives to provide the Business Services to the corresponding Business Users. The ways we use and share this data are further described below.
Business Services
. We use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with Business Users to provide the Services requested by you or the Business User you represent.
In some instances, we may have to submit your Personal Data to a government entity to provide our Business Services, for purposes such as the incorporation of a business, or calculating and paying applicable sales tax. For our tax-related Business Services, we may use your Personal Data to prepare tax documents and file taxes on behalf of the Business User you represent. For our Atlas business incorporation Services, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and file documents with other government authorities, such as articles of incorporation in your state of incorporation.
We share Representatives’ Personal Data with parties authorized by the corresponding Business User, such as Financial Partners servicing a financial product, or third party apps or services the Business User chooses to use alongside our Business Services. Here are common examples of such sharing:
Payment method providers, like Visa or WeChat Pay, require information about Business Users and their Representatives who accept their payment methods. This information is typically required during the onboarding process or for processing transactions and handling disputes for these Business Users.
Learn More
.
A Business User may authorize Stripe to share your Personal Data with other Business Users to facilitate the provision of Services through Stripe Connect.
The use of Personal Data by a third party authorized by a Business User is subject to the third party’s privacy policy.
If you are a Business User who has chosen a name that includes Personal Data (for example, a sole proprietorship or family name in a company name), we will use and share such information for the provision of our Services in the same way we do with any company name. This may include, for example, displaying it on receipts and other transaction-identifying descriptions.
Fraud detection and loss prevention
. We use Representatives’ Personal Data to identify and manage risks that our Business Services might be used for fraudulent activities causing losses to Stripe, End Users, End Customers, Business Users, Financial Partners, and others. We also use information about you obtained from publicly available sources, third parties like credit bureaus and from our Services to address such risks, including to identify patterns of misuse and monitor for terms of service violations. Stripe may share Representatives' Personal Data with Business Users, our Financial Partners, and third party service providers, including phone verification providers,
Learn More
, to verify the information provided by you and identify risk indicators.
Learn More
. We also use and share Representatives' Personal Data to conduct due diligence, including conducting anti-money laundering and sanctions screening in accordance with applicable law.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
. We may also use your Personal Data, including your Stripe account activity, to evaluate your eligibility for and offer you Business Services or promote existing Business Services.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share Representatives’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.4 Visitors
We collect, use, and share the Personal Data of Visitors. More details about how we collect, use, and share Visitors’ Personal Data, along with the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Visitors
When you browse our Sites, we receive your Personal Data, either provided directly by you or collected through our use of cookies and similar technologies. See our
Cookie Policy
for more information. If you opt to complete a form on the Site or third party websites where our advertisements are displayed (like LinkedIn or Facebook), we collect the information you included in the form. This may include your contact information and other information pertaining to your questions about our Services. We may also associate a location with your visit.
Learn More
.
More
. Further details about other types of Personal Data that we may collect from Visitors, including your online activity, can be found in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Visitors
Personalization
. We use the data we collect about you using cookies and similar technologies to measure engagement with the content on the Sites, improve relevancy and navigation, customize your experience (such as language preference and region-specific content), and curate content about Stripe and our Services that's tailored to you. For instance, as not all of our Services are available globally, we may customize our responses based on your region.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Visitors’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
.
Engagement
. As you interact with our Sites, we use the information we collect about and through your devices to provide opportunities for further interactions, such as discussions about Services or interactions with chatbots, to address your questions.
More
. For more information about additional ways we may use and share Visitors’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
2. More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
In addition to the ways described above, we also process your Personal Data as follows:
a. Collection of Personal Data
Online Activity
. Depending on the Service used and how our Business Services are implemented by the Business Users, we may collect information related to:
The devices and browsers you use across our Sites and third party websites, apps, and other online services (“Third Party Sites”).
Usage data associated with those devices and browsers and your engagement with our Services, including data elements like IP address, plug-ins, language preference, time spent on Sites and Third Party Sites, pages visited, links clicked, payment methods used, and the pages that led you to our Sites and Third Party Sites. We also collect activity indicators, such as mouse activity indicators, to help us detect fraud.
Learn More
. See also our
Cookie Policy
.
Communication and Engagement Information
. We also collect information you choose to share with us through various channels, such as support tickets, emails, or social media. If you respond to emails or surveys from Stripe, we collect your email address, name, and any other data you opt to include in your email or responses. If you engage with us over the phone, we collect your phone number and any other information you might provide during the call. Calls with Stripe or Stripe representatives may be recorded.
Learn More
. Additionally, we collect your engagement data, like your registration for, attendance at, or viewing of Stripe events and any other interactions with Stripe personnel.
Forums and Discussion Groups
. If our Sites allow posting of content, we collect Personal Data that you provide in connection with the post.
b. Use of Personal Data.
Besides the use of Personal Data described above, we use Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Analyzing, Improving, and Developing our Services
. We collect and process Personal Data throughout our various Services, whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, to improve our Services, develop new Services, and support our efforts to make our Services more efficient, relevant, and useful to you.
Learn More
.  We may use Personal Data to generate aggregate and statistical information to understand and explain how our Services are used.  Examples of how we use Personal Data to analyze, improve, and develop our products and services include:
Using analytics on our Sites, including as described in our Cookie Policy, to help us understand your use of our Sites and Services and diagnose technical issues.
Training machine learning models to power our Services and protect against fraud and other harm.
Learn more
.
Analyzing and drawing inferences from Transaction Data to reduce costs, fraud, and disputes and increase authentication and authorization rates for Stripe and our Business Users.
Communications
. We use the contact information we have about you to deliver our Services,
Learn More
, which may involve sending codes via SMS for your authentication.
Learn More
. If you are an End User, Representative, or Visitor, we may communicate with you using the contact information we have about you to provide information about our Services and our affiliates’ services, invite you to participate in our events, surveys, or user research, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, in compliance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements. For example, when you provide your contact information to us or when we collect your business contact details through participation at trade shows or other events, we may use this data to follow up with you regarding an event, provide information requested about our Services, and include you in our marketing information campaigns. Where permitted under applicable law, we may record our calls with you to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, perform research and quality assurance, and for training purposes.
Social Media and Promotions
. If you opt to submit Personal Data to engage in an offer, program, or promotion, we use the Personal Data you provide to manage the offer, program, or promotion. We also use the Personal Data you provide, along with the Personal Data you make available on social media platforms, for marketing purposes, unless we are not permitted to do so.
Fraud Prevention and Security
. We collect and use Personal Data to help us identify and manage activities that could be fraudulent or harmful across our Services, enable our fraud detection Business Services, and secure our Services and transactions against unauthorized access, use, alteration or misappropriation of Personal Data, information, and funds. As part of the fraud prevention, detection, security monitoring, and compliance efforts for Stripe and its Business Users, we collect information from publicly available sources, third parties (such as credit bureaus), and via the Services we offer. In some instances, we may also collect information about you directly from you, or from our Business Users, Financial Partners, and other third parties for the same purposes. Furthermore, to protect our Services, we may receive details such as IP addresses and other identifying data about potential security threats from third parties.
Learn More
. Such information helps us verify identities, conduct credit checks where lawfully permitted, and prevent fraud. Additionally, we might use technology to evaluate the potential risk of fraud associated with individuals seeking to procure our Business Services or arising from attempted transactions by an End Customer or End User with our Business Users or Financial Partners.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
. We use Personal Data to meet our contractual and legal obligations related to anti-money laundering, Know-Your-Customer ("KYC") laws, anti-terrorism activities, safeguarding vulnerable customers, export control, and prohibition of doing business with restricted persons or in certain business fields, among other legal obligations. For example, we may monitor transaction patterns and other online signals and use those insights to identify fraud, money laundering, and other harmful activity that could affect Stripe, our Financial Partners, End Users, Business Users and others.
Learn More
. Safety, security, and compliance for our Services are key priorities for us, and collecting and using Personal Data is crucial to this effort.
Minors
. Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and we request that they do not provide Personal Data to seek Services directly from Stripe. In certain jurisdictions, we may impose higher age limits as required by applicable law.
c. Sharing of Personal Data.
Besides the sharing of Personal Data described above, we share Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Stripe Affiliates
. We share Personal Data with other Stripe-affiliated entities for purposes identified in this Policy.
Service Providers or Processors
. In order to provide, communicate, market, analyze, and advertise our Services, we depend on service providers. These providers offer critical services such as providing cloud infrastructure, conducting analytics for the assessment of the speed, accuracy, and/or security of our Services, verifying identities, identifying potentially harmful activity, and providing customer service and audit functions. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the Personal Data we make available to them to perform services on our behalf and to comply with relevant legal obligations. We require these service providers to contractually commit to security and confidentiality obligations for the Personal Data they process on our behalf. The majority of our service providers are based in the European Union, the United States of America, and India.
Learn More
.
Financial Partners
. We share Personal Data with certain Financial Partners to provide Services to Business Users and offer certain Services in conjunction with these Financial Partners. For instance, we may share certain Personal Data, such as payment processing volume, loan repayment data, and Representative contact information, with institutional investors and lenders who purchase loan receivables or provide financing related to Stripe Capital.
Learn More
.
Others with Consent
. In some situations, we may not offer a service, but instead refer you to others (like professional service firms that we partner with to deliver the Atlas Service). In these instances, we will disclose the identity of the third party and the information to be shared with them, and seek your consent to share the information.
Corporate Transactions
. If we enter or intend to enter a transaction that modifies the structure of our business, such as a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, change of control, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock, we may share Personal Data with third parties in connection with such transaction. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your Personal Data, subject to the terms of this Policy.
Compliance and Harm Prevention
. We share Personal Data when we believe it is necessary to comply with applicable law; to abide by rules imposed by Financial Partners in connection with the use of their payment method; to enforce our contractual rights; to secure and protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety, and property of Stripe, you, and others, including against malicious or fraudulent activity; and to respond to valid legal requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
3. Legal bases for processing Personal Data
For purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection laws, we rely on a number of legal bases to process your Personal Data.
Learn More
. For some jurisdictions, there may be additional legal bases, which are outlined in the
Jurisdiction-Specific Provisions
section below.
a. Contractual and Pre-Contractual Business Relationships
. We process Personal Data to enter into business relationships with prospective Business Users and End Users and fulfill our respective contractual obligations with them. These processing activities include:
Creation and management of Stripe accounts and Stripe account credentials, including the assessment of applications to initiate or expand the use of our Services;
Creation and management of Stripe Checkout accounts;
Accounting, auditing, and billing activities; and
Processing of payments and related activities, which include fraud detection, loss prevention, transaction optimization, communications about such payments, and related customer service activities.
b. Legal Compliance
. We process Personal Data to verify the identities of individuals and entities to comply with obligations related to fraud monitoring, prevention, and detection, laws associated with identifying and reporting illicit and illegal activities, such as those under the Anti-Money Laundering ("AML") and Know-Your-Customer (“KYC") regulations, and financial reporting obligations. For example, we may be required to record and verify a Business User’s identity to comply with regulations designed to prevent money laundering, fraud, and financial crimes. These legal obligations may require us to report our compliance to third parties and subject ourselves to third party verification audits.
c. Legitimate Interests
. Where permitted under applicable law, we rely on our legitimate business interests to process your Personal Data. The following list provides an example of the business purposes for which we have a legitimate interest in processing your data:
Detection, monitoring, and prevention of fraud and unauthorized payment transactions;
Mitigation of financial loss, claims, liabilities or other harm to End Customers, End Users, Business Users, Financial Partners, and Stripe;
Determination of eligibility for and offering new Stripe Services (
Learn More
);
Response to inquiries, delivery of Service notices, and provision of customer support;
Promotion, analysis, modification, and improvement of our Services, systems, and tools, as well as the development of new products and services, including enhancing the reliability of the Services;
Management, operation, and improvement of the performance of our Sites and Services, through understanding their effectiveness and optimizing our digital assets;
Analysis and advertisement of our Services, and related improvements;
Aggregate analysis and development of business intelligence that enable us to operate, protect, make informed decisions about, and report on the performance of our business;
Sharing of Personal Data with third party service providers that offer services on our behalf and business partners that help us in operating and improving our business (
Learn More)
;
Enabling network and information security throughout Stripe and our Services; and
Sharing of Personal Data among our affiliates.
d. Consent
. We may rely on consent or explicit consent to collect and process Personal Data regarding our interactions with you and the provision of our Services such as Link, Financial Connections, Atlas, and Identity. When we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and such a withdrawal will not impact the legality of processing performed based on the consent prior to its withdrawal.
e. Substantial Public Interest
. We may process special categories of Personal Data, as defined by the GDPR, when such processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest and consistent with applicable law, such as when we conduct politically-exposed person checks. We may also process Personal Data related to criminal convictions and offenses when such processing is authorized by applicable law, such as when we conduct sanctions screening to comply with AML and KYC obligations.
f. Other valid legal bases
. We may process Personal Data further to other valid legal bases as recognized under applicable law in specific jurisdictions. See the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section below for more information.
4. Your rights and choices
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have choices regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Data:
a. Opting out of receiving electronic communications from us
If you wish to stop receiving marketing-related emails from us, you can opt-out by clicking the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We'll try to process your request(s) as quickly as reasonably practicable. However, it's important to note that even if you opt out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we retain the right to communicate with you about the Services you receive (like support and important legal notices) and our Business Users might still send you messages or instruct us to send you messages on their behalf.
b. Your data protection rights
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Personal Data we process about you as a data controller:
The right to request confirmation of whether Stripe is processing Personal Data associated with you, the categories of personal data it has processed, and the third parties or categories of third parties with which your Personal Data is shared;
The right to request access to the Personal Data Stripe processes about you (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe rectify or update your Personal Data if it's inaccurate, incomplete, or outdated;
The right to request that Stripe erase your Personal Data in certain circumstances as provided by law (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe restrict the use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as while Stripe is considering another request you've submitted (for instance, a request that Stripe update your Personal Data);
The right to request that we export the Personal Data we hold about you to another company, provided it's technically feasible;
The right to withdraw your consent if your Personal Data is being processed based on your previous consent;
The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data if we are processing your data based on our legitimate interests; unless there are compelling legitimate grounds or the processing is necessary for legal reasons, we will cease processing your Personal Data upon receiving your objection (
Learn More
);
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising these rights; and
The right to appeal any decision by Stripe relating to your rights by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
, and/or relevant regulatory agencies.
You may have additional rights, depending on applicable law, over your Personal Data. For example, see the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section under United States below.
c. Process for exercising your data protection rights
To exercise your data protection rights related to Personal Data we process as a data controller, visit our
Privacy Center
or contact us as outlined below.  For Personal Data we process as a data processor, please reach out to the relevant data controller (Business User) to exercise your rights. If you contact us regarding your Personal Data we process as a data processor, we will refer you to the relevant data controller to the extent we are able to identify them.
5. Security and Retention
We make reasonable efforts to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk associated with the processing of your Personal Data. We maintain organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect the Personal Data covered by this Policy from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse.
Learn More
. Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We encourage you to assist us in protecting your Personal Data. If you hold a Stripe account, you can do so by using a strong password, safeguarding your password against unauthorized use, and avoiding using identical login credentials you use for other services or accounts for your Stripe account. If you suspect that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for instance, you believe that your Stripe account's security has been compromised), please
contact us
immediately.
We retain your Personal Data for as long as we continue to provide the Services to you or our Business Users, or for a period in which we reasonably foresee continuing to provide the Services. Even after we stop providing Services directly to you or to a Business User that you're doing business with, and even after you close your Stripe account or complete a transaction with a Business User, we may continue to retain your Personal Data to:
Comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Enable fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention activities; and
Comply with our tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations, including when such retention is required by our contractual agreements with our Financial Partners (and where data retention is mandated by the payment methods you've used).
In cases where we keep your Personal Data, we do so in accordance with any limitation periods and record retention obligations imposed by applicable law.
Learn More
.
6. International Data Transfers
As a global business, it's sometimes necessary for us to transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own, including the United States. These countries might have data protection regulations that are different from those in your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from officials, such as law enforcement or security authorities.
Learn More
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom ("UK"), or Switzerland, please refer to our
Privacy Center
for additional details. When a data transfer mechanism is mandated by applicable law, we employ one or more of the following:
Transfers to certain countries or recipients that are recognized as having an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under applicable law.
EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission and the UK International Data Transfer Addendum issued by the Information Commissioner’s Office. You can obtain a copy of the relevant Standard Contractual Clauses.
Learn More
.
Other lawful methods available to us under applicable law.
Stripe, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and as applicable.
Learn More
.
Stripe’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Cross Border Privacy Rules System (“CBPR”) and Privacy Rules for Processor (“PRP”) systems. These systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating economies. Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. More information about the framework can be found
here
and
here
. If you have unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
7. Updates and notifications
We may change this Policy from time to time to reflect new services, changes in our privacy practices or relevant laws. The “Last updated” legend at the top of this Policy indicates when this Policy was last materially revised. Any changes are effective the latter of when we post the revised Policy on the Services or otherwise provide notice of the update as required by law.
We may provide you with disclosures and alerts regarding the Policy or Personal Data collected by posting them on our website and, if you are an End User or Representative, by contacting you through your Stripe Dashboard, email address and/or the physical address listed in your Stripe account.
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
Australia
. “Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under applicable privacy laws in Australia, including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) as amended from time to time.
If we use personal information to make automated decisions that could reasonably be expected to significantly affect your rights or interests, we will provide the legally required information and transparency via our
Privacy Center
, and/or on a case by case basis.
If you are an Australian resident and dissatisfied with our handling of any complaint you raise under this Policy, you may consider contacting the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Brazil
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO Adi Gilad at dpo@stripe.com. Brazilian residents, for whom the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) applies, have rights set forth in Article 18 of the LGPD.
Canada
. As used in this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”), the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63, in British Columbia, the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5, in Alberta, and the Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (“Quebec Private Sector Act”), in Quebec.
Learn more.
“Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under those laws.
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information, including under the Quebec Private Sector Act.  You may contact them via email at privacy@stripe.com.  When Stripe collects Personal Data belonging to Canadian (including Quebec) residents, it transfers that data to data centers in the United States.  When Stripe relies on service providers to process Personal Data as described herein, those service providers may also be located outside of Canada or Quebec.
You have the right to request access or rectification of the Personal Data Stripe holds related to you or to withdraw any consent given to the processing of such personal data.  You may exercise those rights by contacting Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer at privacy@stripe.com.  If you are an End Customer, you should contact the Business User with which you transacted to exercise your rights.
EEA and UK
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If you are a resident of the EEA or the Stripe entity accountable for your Personal data is otherwise subject to the GDPR, and you believe our processing of your information contradicts the GDPR, you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You also have additional rights under the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Learn More
.
India
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Digital Personal Data Protection Act (“DPDPA”) once the DPDPA enters into effect. Further, the term “data controller” includes “data fiduciaries,” and the term “data subject” includes “data principal,” both as defined in the DPDPA.
In some cases, and as permitted under the DPDPA, we may rely on “legitimate use” as a legal basis. For example, we might do so when you voluntarily provide your Personal Data to us. Where we are required to obtain your explicit and informed consent, we will do so on a case by case basis. “Consent Managers” as defined under the DPDPA may submit a request to revoke or provide consent using the methods described in the Contact Us section below, or as set out in the following paragraph, or via other means made available by Stripe in the future. We may ask for proof of authorization and identity before processing such a request.
You have the right to contact Stripe to nominate another individual, who may, in the event of your death or incapacity, exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy and under the DPDPA and implementing regulations.
In certain cases, you may be asked to consent to the collection and processing of your Aadhaar number by Stripe India Private Limited and/or its third party verification partner(s). The purpose of this collection is to facilitate the identification verification process as required under applicable laws. Your provision of Aadhaar details is purely voluntary, and you may provide other identification documents as may be accepted by us from time to time. You will not be denied service merely for not submitting Aadhaar details.
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your Personal Data in India, or if you want to receive this Policy or communicate with us about privacy in one of India’s official languages, please
contact our Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Learn More
. Alternatively, you may contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If we are unable to address your complaint or grievance, you have the right to escalate the matter to the Data Protection Board of India.
Indonesia
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes Law No. 11 of 2008 as amended by Law No. 19 of 2016 on Electronic Information and Transactions, Government Regulation No. 71 of 2019 on the Implementation of Electronic Systems and Transactions, and Minister of Communication and Informatics Regulation No. 20 of 2016 on Personal Data Protection in Electronic Systems, and from September 2024, Law No. 27 of 2022 concerning Personal Data Protection (“PDP Law”). If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Japan
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“APPI”). When we transfer Personal Data of data subjects in Japan to jurisdictions not recognized as ‘adequate’ by the Personal Information Protection Commission, we enter into written agreements with any third parties located outside of Japan. These written agreements provide rights and obligations equivalent to those provided under the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information. For more information on how we ensure that third parties protect your data and where your data is located, please see above or contact us as described below. For a description of foreign systems and frameworks that may affect the implementation of equivalent measures by the third party, see
here
. In some cases, and as permitted under the APPI, we may rely on “public interest” as a legal basis, such as fraud detection and loss prevention.
Malaysia
. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Singapore
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“PDPA”) (No. 26 of 2012) as amended from time to time. In some cases, and as permitted under the PDPA, we may rely on “deemed consent” as a legal basis. For example, we do so when you voluntarily provide your personal data to us. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Switzerland
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (“FADP”), as revised. To exercise your rights under the FADP, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. You may also have additional rights under the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework.
Learn More
.
Thailand
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (“PDPA”). If we rely on certain legal bases (such as “legal obligation” or “contractual necessity” and you do not provide us with your Personal Data, we may not be able to lawfully provide you services. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at
dpo@stripe.com
. Where required, we have put in place appropriate safeguards for the cross-border transfer of Personal Data from Thailand, including the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as adapted for Thailand data transfers in accordance with the Notification of the Personal Data Protection Committee on Criteria for the Protection of Personal Data Sent or Transferred to a Foreign Country Pursuant to Section 29 of the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 B.E. 2566 (2023).
United States
. If you are a consumer located in the United States (“US”), we process your personal information in accordance with US federal and state privacy laws. For additional  details, please review the information below and see our additional U.S. Privacy Disclosures
here
. Stripe uses cookies, including advertising cookies, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Your Rights and Choices
. As a US consumer and subject to certain limitations under US privacy laws, you may have choices regarding our use and disclosure of your Personal Data.  In addition to the
above rights
, you may also have the rights listed in this section. Please see our Privacy Center to
learn more
about data subject rights metrics and
learn more
about the laws under which these rights may apply.
Exercising the right to know: You have a right to request additional information about the categories of personal information collected, sold, disclosed, or shared; purposes for which this personal information was collected, sold, or shared; categories of sources of personal information; and categories of third parties with whom we disclosed or shared this personal information.
Exercising the right to opt-out from a sale or sharing: We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide the data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and Services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes, Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising) as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising)
here
.
Exercising the right to limit the use or sharing of Sensitive Personal Information: We do not sell or share (for behavioral advertising) Sensitive Personal Information as defined by US privacy laws and have not done so in the past 12 months. Learn more about our collection and use of Sensitive Personal Information over the last 12 months
here
.
Profiling with legal or similarly significant effects
: In the event that we engage in profiling or automated decision making for which applicable law entitles you to an opt out we will provide you with notice of how to exercise that opt-out right.
Appeal
: If you wish to appeal any of our decisions regarding a rights request under US privacy laws, you may do so by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
.
To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please contact us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. Please note that rights under some U.S. state laws do not apply to Personal Data we collect, process, and disclose when you act as a consumer to obtain financial products or services from Stripe for personal, family, or household purposes. The federal Gramm-Leach Bliley Act may govern how Stripe shares and protects that data instead. See our
US Consumer Privacy Notice
below for more information.
We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or requiring you to provide information necessary to verify your identity, including name, address, transaction history, photo identification, and other information associated with your account.
You may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. Your agent may submit a request on your behalf by contacting us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. We may still require you to directly verify your identity and confirm that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Global Privacy Control signals
. Stripe honors the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signals.
Learn More
.
9. Contact us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please
contact us
. If you are an End Customer (i.e., an individual doing business or transacting with a Business User), please refer to the privacy policy or notice of the Business User for information regarding the Business User’s privacy practices, choices and controls, or contact the Business User directly.
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and obtains financial services from Stripe primarily for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
Last updated: January 16, 2025
FACTS
WHAT DOES STRIPE DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information.  Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing.  Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information.  Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
• Social Security Number
• Contact details
• Account balances and transaction history
• Payment, transaction, and purchase information and history
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers' personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers' personal information; the reasons Stripe chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does Stripe Share?
Can you limit this sharing
For our everyday business purposes – such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes - to offer our products and Services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data not collected through Financial Connections)
Yes
Yes
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data collected through Financial Connections)
No
We don’t share
To limit our sharing
Login to your Link account at
app.link.com/settings
and toggle off data sharing from the Messaging menu.
Please note: If you are a new customer, we can begin sharing your information 30 days from the date we sent this notice. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
However, you can contact us at any time to limit our sharing.
Questions?
Contact us at privacy@stripe.com or visit us at https://support.link.com
Who we are
Who is providing this notice?
Stripe, Inc., Stripe Payments Company, and their affiliates that provide consumers services in the U.S.
What we do
How does Stripe protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse we use security measures to comply with federal law.  These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.  We impose access controls along with ongoing monitoring to prevent data misuse, and we require our service providers to take similar steps to protect your information.
How does Stripe collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
• open a Link account;
• ask Stripe to process a payment for goods or services;
• provide bank account information to Stripe using Financial Connections
We also collect your personal information from others, such as affiliates or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
• sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
• affiliates from using your information to market to you
• sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you.
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See the Other Important Information section below for more information on your rights under state law.
What happens when I limit sharing for an account I hold jointly with someone else?
Your choices will apply to everyone on your account.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Our affiliates include companies operating under the Stripe name, such as Stripe Technology Europe, Ltd. and Stripe Payments UK, Ltd.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control.  They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf, Business Users with which you choose to transact, partners with which we share data to provide you with services, and advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between non-affiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
• Our joint marketing partners include financial companies we partner with to provide you with financial services.
Other important information
Vermont: If your account with us is associated with a Vermont billing address, we will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures.  For joint marketing, we will only disclose your name, contact information, and information about your transactions.  Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found in our
Privacy Policy
and
Privacy Center
.
California: If your account with us is associated with a California billing address, we will not disclose Personal Data we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.  For instance, we may disclose your Personal Data as necessary to process transactions or provide products and services you request, at your instruction, as required for institution risk control, and to safeguard against fraud, identity theft, and unauthorized transactions.
For additional information about our privacy practices, please visit the
Stripe Privacy Center
.
Sub-policy 1
https://www.freeagent.com/website/privacy/:
You are currently viewing our
[Locale]
site
For information more relevant to your location, select a region from the drop down and press continue.
Select your location...
United Kingdom
United States
Global
Continue
Skip to main content
Privacy
General Privacy Notice
General Privacy Notice
Version 6.8:
This policy was last updated in August 2024. While we will never deviate from our overall philosophy of maintaining your privacy, we may update this policy again in the future and will publish any subsequent versions of it here.
Maintaining your privacy is really important to us. You entrust us with sensitive personal and financial information, and we take that responsibility seriously.
1. Who are we?
FreeAgent Central Limited (
“we”
,
“us”
,
“our”
) is an online accounting and bookkeeping platform for everyone, especially small businesses, freelancers and accountants. We are a member of the NatWest Group Plc (
“Bank”
,
“Group”
). More information about the NatWest Group can be found at NatWestGroup.com by clicking on ‘
About NatWest Group
’.
Our General Privacy Notice explains how we, as a data controller, collect, store and process personal data when you browse our site www.freeagent.com (the “
FreeAgent website
”), use the FreeAgent service/application (“
FreeAgent
”) or otherwise provide personal data to us. Please read this privacy notice carefully to understand how we will treat your data, including personal data.
This privacy notice should be read with our
Terms of Service
, which, together, apply to your use of both the FreeAgent website and FreeAgent service.
2. What information do we collect and receive?
Your personal data
When we say “personal data”, we mean any information that relates to and identifies a living person. Personal data will be contained in the information that you provide to us or that is provided during your interactions with us or our service, or in the information that you authorise a third party to give to us on your behalf.
The financial data that you enter into FreeAgent, or that is provided to FreeAgent from your bank, isn’t part of the personal data discussed here, unless it identifies a person. For more information about your financial data, please see
below
.
When it comes to your personal data, we comply in full with our obligations under the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection legislation. With reference to the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA), FreeAgent does not sell, rent, release, disclose, disseminate, make available, transfer, or otherwise communicate personal information to another business or a third party for monetary or other valuable consideration.
Information you provide
Your personal data includes the information you provide to us or that you authorise someone else to provide (such as your accountant or a third party is authorised to provide us with your details) when you or they:
sign up for a FreeAgent account
elect to have a FreeAgent account provided to you
sign up to receive our emails or communications
participate in or answer questionnaires or surveys, provide feedback or enter competitions
provide information in your FreeAgent account profile
provide information during a support enquiry about you and/or your organisation
provide information when you complete any forms which you submit to us, e.g. when you authorise us to receive transaction information from your bank
provide information via an upload or data transfer to your FreeAgent account
Examples of this personal data include name, email address, contact number, as well as any correspondence sent by you when you contact us. It could also include: your bank account details and bank transaction details (if that information identifies a person); details in any invoices or receipts that you upload (if they identify a person); and/or information to identify customers in vulnerable situations so that we can offer them support or protection.
FreeAgent has no requirement to collect or process any special categories of personal data, as defined under GDPR and the Data Protection Act 2018, in order to provide the service. In addition, we do not knowingly collect or solicit any personal data from anyone under the age of 18 or knowingly allow such persons to register for FreeAgent. FreeAgent is not directed at children under the age of 18. In the event that we learn that we have collected personal data from a child under age 18 without verification of parental consent, we will delete that information as quickly as possible.
Your financial data
In addition to your own personal data, we may also hold financial data that you enter into FreeAgent in order to make use of our services. Examples of your financial data include your organisation’s invoices, expenses, receipts and bank transactions. You are in control of the financial data, subject to our
Terms of Service
. For example, if you want to
give your accountant access to your financial data
, you can switch this on in FreeAgent. Likewise, you can also
stop a feed of data from your bank
or
remove an accountant’s access at any time
.
It is your responsibility to safeguard your login information and control third party account access. You also need to make sure you have made suitable disclosures and, where applicable, have obtained any relevant consents or permissions necessary for you to upload the data of others (such as suppliers, employees and clients) to FreeAgent and for that data to be used as set out in this notice. If, at any time, you want to prevent third party access to your FreeAgent account or stop any transfer of data between your bank and your FreeAgent account, please contact
support@freeagent.com
or talk to your accountant.
Information we collect
We collect information about your usage of our service and website to improve our service, understand trends and enhance and customise content and campaigns. Some of this data may be personal data, where it relates to an identifiable person. We collect your information and use it to:
monitor patterns of usage, such as login dates and volumes of data, so we can understand how people are using FreeAgent, keep FreeAgent secure and to develop and improve our products
monitor patterns of usage so that we can tailor any communications we may send to you or advertising that you may receive. For example, we may tailor a newsletter with information about product features that you haven’t tried yet, instead of features that you use frequently. We want the content of our communications to be relevant and useful to you
aid in our monitoring of usage patterns and for security reasons, we log your Internet Protocol (IP) address when you use our website (this is the individual identification number that is assigned to your computer when it’s connected to the internet)
monitor traffic information to our website and emails, including page visits, email clicks, purchases, referring sites, and video viewings. We use this information to improve our website, advertising, promotions, and to understand customer behaviour. Please see
section 10
below regarding our notice on cookies
Information others provide to us
We may receive information from other companies or entities (e.g. your bank or accountant) when you have authorised that third party to provide information to us. This could, in certain circumstances, include the initial information to enable us to create your account (e.g. your full name, your email address and your business type), as well as your bank transaction data.
3. What do we use your personal data for?
We collect and use your personal data for a variety of business reasons. We need some of the data to enter into and perform our contract with you (and if relevant, with the party who set up and manages your FreeAgent account), maintain the security of our systems and provide you with access to FreeAgent. This data includes your contact details and other information requested during the FreeAgent setup process. If you fail to provide this data, or refuse to do so, we may be unable to provide our service to you.
All the processing we carry out is underpinned by a set of processing conditions. These are the legal bases under which we have the authority to collect, use and store your personal information. The following is a summary of how these could apply to you within the FreeAgent service.
Contractual necessity
We will process data where it is necessary to enter into a contract with you (and if relevant, with the party who set up and manages your FreeAgent account) for the provision of the FreeAgent service or to perform our obligations under that contract. Please note that if you do not agree to provide us with certain requested information it may be difficult for the service to operate as intended or at all. Examples include:
processing and reviewing applications for the FreeAgent service, products and services available from or through FreeAgent, including making decisions about whether to agree to approve any application
executing your instructions; processing transactions, providing support or advice, resolving any queries or discrepancies and administering any changes
receiving calls or emails to our support team
managing and maintaining our relationships with you and for ongoing customer service
communicating with you about the service and products you receive from us or via the FreeAgent service
delivering mandatory communications to users of the service, providing service messages, publishing revised disclosures or terms and conditions
Please note - you will retain complete discretion to terminate your account with FreeAgent where we/you consider that it does not meet your needs or expectations.
Legal obligation
When you elect to use the FreeAgent service, we are required by law to collect and process certain personal information about you. Please be aware that, should you refuse to provide us with certain mandatory information, it may not be possible for you to access the service. Examples include:
confirming your identity and protecting against fraud as part of a model for secure access
performing checks on the service and monitoring transactions and location data for the purpose of preventing and detecting crime and to comply with laws relating to money laundering, sanctions, fraud, terrorist financing, bribery and corruption
sharing information with police, law enforcement, tax authorities or other government and fraud prevention agencies where we have a legal obligation to do so, including reporting suspicious activity and complying with production and court orders
conducting investigations into suspected criminal acts, breaches of conduct and corporate policies
evidencing and substantiating our accounts, revenue and billing to our auditors, regulators and any other approved third party
Legitimate interests
We may process your personal data within FreeAgent where it is in our or a third party’s legitimate interests to do so, and without prejudicing your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. Examples include:
delivering service insights and personalised recommendations to you which help to maximise your use of FreeAgent and its products and services, or those products and services from our parent company and trusted third parties
investigating, handling and resolving any complaints, queries or requests
providing you with updates about the FreeAgent service and its functionality, including new features and services
analysing your personal data and financial data so that we can administer, support, improve and develop our business, customer service and features of the FreeAgent service. We may use third parties to assist us in performing these activities from time to time and, in those cases, we may pass on your personal and/or financial data to them. We will only share your data with third parties that we trust, and when there are assurances in place as to how they will protect the data
performing assessments and analysing customer information for the purposes of managing, improving and fixing data quality
providing assurance that we have effective processes to identify, manage, monitor and report on the risks FreeAgent might be exposed to (e.g. security, fraud and client confidentiality)
improving your experience of the FreeAgent service by:
gathering feedback from you on your use of and interactions within our service
assessing your use of our service
tracking your interactions with our service to tailor the content
recording and monitoring communications to our telephone and online helplines
recording information about you that considers your welfare or vulnerability needs including any adjustments, support or different products or services which might be suitable or protections to put in place
taking action if we need to defend our legal rights under our Terms of Service if you misuse the service or act in a way which contravenes laws, regulations or our Terms of Service
utilising available support functions for the management of the service, which may include:
budgeting
advice from our legal and accounting teams
technology support from relevant expert areas and third parties
tracking and analysing your use of our service to prepare reports on its performance
sharing anonymous or aggregate data in order to get you the best deals available on associated products and services, or with trusted third parties for research purposes
validating your information (and, in some cases, matching it against information that has been collected by a third party, for example Companies House) to check that the data we hold is accurate, consistent and current
monitoring anonymous, aggregated information about accounting and financial data so that we can produce insights about small business finance. For example, based on an anonymous, aggregate data analysis, we may produce a white paper that reports on how most small businesses are not paid on time
performing research and trend analysis to optimise your experience of the service
developing and enhancing our data models to improve the accuracy of the service and your insights
engaging our users by:
gathering your feedback on the service
reporting at an aggregate level on the user experience and service performance
engaging and communicating with our users on social media and via SMS/email
providing you with detailed information on your account activity
using your personal information in an anonymised and aggregated form to create content to include in:
infographics, industry reports and media campaigns
blog posts and videos on the FreeAgent service
emails that inform users about the success and performance of the service
posts from social media accounts owned and operated by FreeAgent
ensure business continuity and disaster recovery and respond to information technology and business incidents and emergencies
ensure network and information security for the purpose of preventing cyber-attacks, unauthorised use of our telecommunications systems and websites, prevention and detection of crime and protection of your personal data
protect our legal rights and interests
enable a proposed or actual sale, reorganisation, transfer or other transaction relating to our business
send you relevant marketing information where you have not opted out (or where you have provided your permission)
assess the quality of our customer services and to provide staff training. Calls, video calls and other communications may be recorded and monitored for these purposes
Consent
We may rely on consent for the following:
where we use
cookies or similar technologies
where we collect your permission for sending marketing
any other processing where we request your consent
4. Who do we share your information with?
Elective third-party access to FreeAgent data
Should you choose to use parts of FreeAgent that permit the sharing of your personal and/or financial data with third parties (for example, if you choose to give your accountant or your bank access to your data), then your personal and/or financial data will be shared in that way. Such personal or financial data may include general, financial and transactional data, and information from your account such as accounting ledger balances, bank transactions and invoices, bills, expenses and project details. These third parties will use that data in accordance with any permissions and consents you have given us or that you may give to us in the future.
Supplier and third-party arrangements
As part of the service, we may need to share your personal information outside FreeAgent. There are limited circumstances in which we would do this and we will always have a compelling business reason to do so. Examples of when we will share your information include, but is not limited to:
when we have your permission to do so
when you ask us to share your information as part of the service or a connected product you are interested in so that we can tailor your experience
when you instruct us to share your information with your bank or to add accounts from other providers to the FreeAgent service
when part of the service, or a product you are interested in, is supported or provided by a third party outside FreeAgent
when we are under a duty to disclose or share your personal or financial data in order to comply with any legal or regulatory obligation
to cooperate with law enforcement officials, judicial bodies, government entities, tax authorities or regulatory bodies in the investigation of unlawful activities of FreeAgent users or relating to FreeAgent users; or in order to enforce or apply any contract with you; or to protect our rights, property, or the safety of our employees, customers or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organisations for the purposes of fraud protection and credit risk reduction
sharing with third parties and other financial services companies to help prevent, detect and prosecute unlawful acts and fraudulent behaviour
sharing with suppliers, sub-contractors and advisors who support the operation of the service, provide information or manage connected products
sharing with third parties in the event that we, our business, or substantially all of its assets are acquired by a third party (in which case, personal information about customers will be one of the transferred assets)
passing aggregate information on the usage of the FreeAgent service, where relevant, to maintain, improve and manage the FreeAgent service or for the purposes of research
with social media companies (in a secure format) or other third party advertisers and marketing companies so they can display or send relevant messages to you and other or compile information relevant to marketing to you about our products and services on our behalf. Third party advertisers may also use information about your previous web activity to tailor adverts which are displayed to you
We will always take steps to ensure that the safety and security of your information is maintained. We will implement and maintain technical and organisational measures for each transfer of personal information and mandate that our partners and third parties do the same. No ownership rights to the data will be transferred to any third party, unless otherwise notified.
We will not share your information with third parties for their own marketing purposes without your permission.
NatWest Group
FreeAgent is a wholly owned subsidiary of NatWest Group. Some customers will have their FreeAgent account as part of the terms and conditions of their NatWest Group business current account.
Being owned by NatWest Group does not mean that we will share your FreeAgent information with NatWest, whether you are a NatWest customer or not. We will only use and share your information with other NatWest group companies where it is necessary for us to lawfully carry out our business activities.
Examples of the scenarios where FreeAgent may share with NatWest:
Aggregated customer information for the purposes of our contract with NatWest, for billing and for anonymous analytics
High-level customer information, for example account name and mutual identifiers, to help NatWest understand which customers use FreeAgent, and to better inform their communications and marketing
Specific customer information if we believe you are breaching our terms of service, or where we are fulfilling a legal obligation such as responding to a Legal Order, reporting financial crime or similar
Some NatWest employees may be granted access to FreeAgent systems for the purposes of data and analytics, security or compliance. Access to customer information will always be suitably restricted and we will confirm user access regularly
We may discuss the specifics of complaints for our mutual customers, which may contain personal data, for the purposes of complaint resolution and reaching a fair outcome for customers
Transferring information overseas
We will, from time to time, have to transfer your information to third parties or organisations in other countries. This will only happen on the basis that any party which we pass your information to will protect it in the same way that we would and in accordance with applicable laws.
In the event that we transfer information to countries outside of the European Economic Area (which includes countries in the European Union as well as Iceland, Liechtenstein and Norway), we will only do so when:
the European Commission has decided that the country or the organisation we are sharing your information with will protect your information adequately
the transfer has been authorised by the relevant data protection authority
we have entered into a valid contract with the third party or organisation with which we are sharing your information (on terms approved by the European Commission) to ensure your information is adequately protected
For a full list of sub-processors and details of the safeguards in place in respect of data transfers outside the EEA, please see
here
.
Additionally, you may grant third party access to your personal or financial data by enabling the FreeAgent API for that third party. At all times, this access is controlled by you. FreeAgent is not responsible for the privacy practices employed by any third party given access by you to your personal or financial data by the FreeAgent API. Use of the FreeAgent API is governed by the
FreeAgent API Terms
.
5. How long do we store your data for?
We only store your data for as long as is necessary for the purposes of processing that are set out in this notice. When you cancel your account with FreeAgent, you can either delete your data immediately in-app via the
Delete Account
function, or we will automatically delete your data after one year. The table below details our retention notice for all types of accounts.
Account Type
Description
Retention period
Cancelled
Account cancelled by Account Holder
1 year
Expired Free Trial
Free Trial account is not subscribed to
2 years
Suspended
Account suspended due to non-payment or lack of use
2 years
Disengaged
NatWest Group customers who stop using FreeAgent
2 years
Non-activated
Incomplete signups from NatWest Group
1 year
Please note that if you are a Direct customer (as defined in the Schedule of the
Terms of Service
), then we reserve the right to suspend your account should you not regularly access the account. This is to ensure you do not pay for an account you do not use, but also to ensure your data is not retained indefinitely. Please
get in touch
for further information.
Should your FreeAgent account be deleted, we will then anonymise or delete records held outside of the application, such as customer support tickets or analytics data. This excludes any records that we are obliged to keep to fulfil our Legal Obligations. We may choose to anonymise or delete records that are outside of our application prior to your account being deleted. This is to ensure we keep records only when we need them.
If you are signed up to marketing communications, cancelling your FreeAgent account will not automatically cancel your marketing preferences. If you would like to unsubscribe, please email
privacy@freeagent.com
, otherwise we will delete your email address from our system after two years of inactivity.
6. You can export your account data at any time
You can export a copy of your data whenever you like - this will include some elements of your personal data and that of your clients, contacts and suppliers, your financial transactions, invoices, and expenses. We recommend that you use the
export functionality
to keep a backup of your data. You can also ask us for a copy of your personal data that we hold - see
section 9
below for more information.
7. You can delete your data at any time
You have the right to delete any information that you post to your FreeAgent account using the
Delete Account
option in the settings area of FreeAgent. Using this option cancels and deletes your FreeAgent account and all associated data. You can also use the
Reset Data
option to reset your FreeAgent account after loading test data during your free trial. Using this option immediately deletes all data previously entered into your account. If you’re unsure whether or not to delete any data in FreeAgent then please check with your accountant.
To ensure the integrity of our systems and your data, we utilise various technologies to continually take secure, encrypted backups. All data, including deleted data, remains archived within these backups, which are maintained according to our defined two-year data retention policy, after which they are deleted. Deleting your data removes it from our active servers immediately, however, we retain archived database backups for two years, after which time they are permanently deleted.
We highly recommend that you export your data before cancelling, since many countries (including the UK) require you to retain your business records going back many years, even if you have finished trading. FreeAgent is under no obligation to retain data on your behalf if you are no longer subscribed to the FreeAgent service.
We retain historical details about your payments to FreeAgent or payments made to us by third parties for your subscription, for accounting purposes because we are required by law to do so. We will only retain these for as long as we need them.
When your account is deleted, we may also choose to anonymise your Personal Data so that you cannot be identified. This is often used to ensure that we keep relevant records and logs, without impacting your rights or freedoms.
8. We don’t store your credit card details
Once your free trial is over, or if you purchase an Add-on, you may need to provide payment details to start your subscription and continue using FreeAgent. Where this information is provided, it is passed directly to our payment service provider,
Stripe
, via an encrypted link and is never stored on our systems. We handle ongoing billing by passing a token to Stripe that identifies your account (find out more about
Stripe’s privacy policy
).
9. What are your rights?
Access to your personal data:
You have a right to get access to the personal information we hold about you. If you would like a copy of the personal information we hold about you, please contact us at
privacy@freeagent.com
.
Right to change or withdraw your consent:
Where you have given us consent to make use of your personal data for any of the purposes outlined in this notice, you may withdraw that consent by contacting us using the details located in
section 13
of this notice. If you wish to change your contact preferences or you no longer wish to be contacted for marketing purposes,
get in touch
.
Right to rectification
: You have a right to rectification of inaccurate personal information and to update incomplete personal information. If you need to update out-of-date or inaccurate information we hold about you, please log on to your FreeAgent account and update your information or
get in touch
.
Right to erasure:
You are free to delete your data at any point, using the
Reset Data
and/or
Delete Account
functionality. You may request that we delete your personal information if you believe that:
we no longer need to process your information for the purposes for which it was provided
we have requested your permission to process your personal information where required for a particular purpose and you wish to withdraw your consent
we are not using your information in a lawful manner
Please note that if you request that we delete your information, we may have to suspend the operation of your account and/or the products and services we provide to you. The right to erasure also only applies to certain data and there are exceptions. For more information or to make a request, please
get in touch
.
Right to data portability:
In certain circumstances, you may ask us to provide you with the personal data that we hold about you in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable form, or ask for us to send such personal data to another data controller. You can use the
Export All Data
functionality at any time to export your data in this manner.
Right to object:
You have a right to object to us processing your personal information (and to request us to restrict processing), unless we can demonstrate compelling and legitimate grounds for the processing, which may override your own interests, or where we need to process your information to investigate and protect us or others from legal claims. Please note that if you object to us processing your information, we may have to suspend the operation of the product or service we provide to you. If you would like to object to our processing of your personal information, please
get in touch
.
Right to restrict processing:
You may request that we restrict processing your personal information if you believe that:
any of the information that we hold about you is inaccurate
we no longer need to process your information for the purposes for which it was provided, but you require the information to establish, exercise or defend legal claims
we are not using your information in a lawful manner
Please note that if you request that we restrict processing your information, we may have to suspend the products or services we provide to you. If you wish to exercise your right to restrict processing, please
get in touch
.
Make a complaint:
You have the right to make a complaint about our data processing activities to a supervisory authority. In the UK this is the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO). Further details can be found on their website. In line with the ICO’s guidance, please raise your complaint with us first so we may try to address your concerns.
Getting in touch:
To make enquiries and/or to exercise any of your rights as outlined in this privacy notice please contact our team at
privacy@freeagent.com
.
10. Use of cookies
Cookies are small files saved to your device that track, save and store information about your interactions and usage of our services. The primary purpose for our use of cookies is to allow us to provide a smooth, efficient and personalised experience for our users, both on and off our website, through remembering your preferences, securely storing your password (if requested) and serving you more relevant advertising.
If you want to manage or disable cookies for the FreeAgent website or any other site, you can do so by changing your browser settings. Please bear in mind that disabling functional cookies may impair the availability and/or functionality of the FreeAgent service. We suggest consulting the “Help” section of your browser or taking a look at the
About Cookies
website which offers guidance for all modern browsers.
For more information about the cookies we use, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
Manage Cookie Preferences
11. Security and data storage
We take security and privacy seriously. We will endeavour to take all reasonable steps to keep your personal and financial data secure once it has been transferred to our systems. We adopt appropriate, industry-standard data collection, storage and processing practices and security measures to protect against unauthorised access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. For further details of the security measures we have implemented, please see
here
.
Where we utilise third parties to help provide our services, we will always ensure that, as a minimum, the security policies and confidentiality arrangements of those third parties adhere to the same requirements that we impose and expect.
Where we have given you (or where you have chosen) a password that enables you to access certain parts of the FreeAgent website or FreeAgent itself, you are responsible for keeping this password confidential. We ask you not to share your password with anyone.
We shall periodically check that the personal data we store for you is accurate. If you would like to update the personal data we hold about you, please log in to your FreeAgent account or contact us at
privacy@freeagent.com
with your request.
Please note that the internet is not a secure medium and although we will do our best to protect your data, we cannot guarantee the security of any data transmitted to FreeAgent. Any such transmission is at your own risk.
12. Changes to this Privacy Notice
We may modify or update this Privacy Notice from time to time to reflect the changes in our business and practices, so you should review this page periodically. When we change the notice in a material manner, we will let you know (either by email or in-app notification) and will update the ‘last updated’ header at the top of this page.
This Privacy Notice was most recently amended in August 2024.
13. Getting in touch
If you have any queries relating to this Privacy Notice or FreeAgent’s use of your personal or financial data, please contact our support team at
privacy@freeagent.com
. Alternatively, our office address is noted below.
FreeAgent Support
One Edinburgh Quay
133 Fountainbridge
Edinburgh
EH3 9QG
privacy@freeagent.com
Company contact
One Edinburgh Quay
133 Fountainbridge
Edinburgh
EH3 9QG
info@freeagent.com
Sub-policy 2
https://www.shopify.com/legal/privacy:
Skip to Content
Updated March 2, 2023
Privacy Policy
How Shopify handles your data
Table of Contents
Introduction
Our values
Why we process your information
Your rights over your information
Where we send your information
How long do we retain your information
Our use of Machine Learning
How we protect your information
How we use “cookies” and other tracking technologies
How you can reach us
United States Regional Privacy Notice
Introduction
In our mission to make commerce better for everyone at Shopify, we collect and use information about you, our
merchants using Shopify
to power your business
customers
who shop at a Shopify-powered business
partners
who develop apps for merchants to use, build stores on behalf of merchants, refer potential entrepreneurs to Shopify, or otherwise help merchants operate or improve their Shopify-powered business
users of Shopify apps
and services like
Shop
or
Shop Pay
visitors to
Shopify’s websites
, or anyone contacting
Shopify support
This Privacy Policy will help you better understand how we collect, use, and share your personal information. If we change our privacy practices, we may update this privacy policy. If any changes are significant, we will let you know (for example, through the Shopify admin or by email).
Our values
Trust is the foundation of the Shopify platform and includes trusting us to do the right thing with your information. Three main values guide us as we develop our products and services. These values should help you better understand how we think about your information and privacy.
Your information belongs to you
We carefully analyze what types of information we need to provide our services, and we try to limit the information we collect to only what we really need. Where possible, we delete or anonymize this information when we no longer need it. When building and improving our products, our engineers work closely with our privacy and security teams to build with privacy in mind. In all of this work our guiding principle is that your information belongs to you, and we aim to only use your information to your benefit.
We protect your information from others
If a third party requests your personal information, we will refuse to share it unless you give us permission or we are legally required. When we are legally required to share your personal information, we will tell you in advance, unless we are legally forbidden.
We help merchants and partners meet their privacy obligations
Many of the merchants and partners using Shopify do not have the benefit of a dedicated privacy team, and it is important to us to help them meet their privacy obligations. To do this, we try to build our products and services so they can easily be used in a privacy-friendly way. We also provide detailed FAQs and documentation covering the most important privacy topics, and respond to privacy-related questions we receive.
Why we process your information
We generally process your information when we need to do so to fulfill a contractual obligation (for example, to process your subscription payments to use the Shopify platform), or where we or someone we work with needs to use your personal information for a reason related to their business (for example, to provide you with a service). Laws in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) and in the United Kingdom (“UK”) call these reasons “legitimate interests.” These “legitimate interests” include:
preventing risk and fraud
answering questions or providing other types of support
helping merchants find and use apps through our app store
providing and improving our products and services
providing reporting and analytics
testing out features or additional services
assisting with marketing, advertising, or other communications
We only process personal information for these “legitimate interests” after considering the potential risks to your privacy and balancing any risks with certain measures—for example, by providing clear transparency into our privacy practices, offering you control over your personal information where appropriate, limiting the information we keep, limiting what we do with your information, who we send your information to, how long we keep your information, or the technical measures we use to protect your information.
We may also process your personal information where you have provided your consent. In particular, where we cannot rely on an alternative legal basis for processing, where you direct us to transfer information to a third party, where we receive your data from a third party is sourced and it already comes with consent or where we are required by law to ask for your consent (including in the context of some of our sales and marketing activities). At any time, you have a right to withdraw your consent by changing your communication choices, opting out from our communications or by contacting us.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant, to understand our purposes for processing, categories of recipients and legal basis for processing for each type of personal data.
Your rights over your information
We believe you should be able to access and control your personal information no matter where you live. Depending on how you use Shopify, you may have the right to request access to, correct, amend, delete, port to another service provider, restrict, or object to certain uses of your personal information. We will not charge you more or provide you with a different level of service if you exercise any of these rights. Please note that a number of these rights apply only in certain circumstances, and all of these rights may be limited by law.
If you buy something from or otherwise provide your information to a Shopify-powered store and wish to exercise these rights over information about your purchase or interaction, you need to directly contact the merchant you interacted with. We are a processor and process information on their behalf. We will of course help our merchants to fulfill these requests to the extent required by law, such as by giving them the tools to do so and by answering their questions.
If you are a merchant, partner, Shop user, Shopify employee, website visitor or other individual that Shopify has a direct relationship with, please submit your data subject request through our
online portal
. Please note that if you send us a request relating to your personal information, we have to make sure that it is you before we can respond. In order to do so, we may use a third party to collect and verify identification documents. Further information about rights available to US residents can be found below under the header “United States Regional Privacy Notice”.
If you are not happy with our response to a request, you can contact us to resolve the issue. If you are located in the EEA or UK, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection or privacy authority at any time.
Finally, because there is no common understanding about what a
“Do Not Track”
signal is supposed to mean, we don’t respond to those signals in any particular way.
Where we send your information
We are a Canadian company, but we work with and process data about individuals across the world. To operate our business, we may send your personal information outside of your state, province, or country, including to the United States. This data may be subject to the laws of the countries where we send it. We take steps to protect your information when we send your information across borders.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant.
Transfers outside of Europe and Switzerland
If you are located in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, your personal information is controlled by our Irish affiliate, Shopify International Ltd. Your information is then sent to other Shopify locations and to service providers who may be located in other regions, including Canada (where we are based) and the United States. When we send your personal information outside of the EEA, UK or Switzerland, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
If you are in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, when we send your personal information to Canada it is protected under Canadian law, which the European Commission has found adequately protects your information. If we then send this personal information outside of Canada (for example, when we send this information to our
Subprocessors
), this information is protected by contractual commitments that are comparable to those provided in the
Standard Contractual Clauses.
Finally, while we do what we can to protect your information, we may at times be legally required to disclose your personal information (for example, if we receive a valid court order). For information about how we respond to such orders, please review our
Guidelines for Legal Requests
.
How long do we retain your information
We will retain your personal data only for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which we have collected it. To determine the appropriate retention period, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of your personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means and the applicable legal requirements. We will also retain and use your personal information to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce our policies. If you stop using our services or if you delete your account with us, we will delete your information or store your information in an aggregated and anonymized format.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant, for further details on the retention of your personal information.
Our use of Machine Learning
One of the ways in which we are able to help merchants using Shopify is by using techniques like “machine learning” (some laws, including certain EEA and UK laws, may refer to this as “automated decision-making”) to help us improve our services. When we use machine learning, we either: (1) still have a human being involved in the process (and so are not fully automated); or (2) use machine learning in ways that don’t have legal or similarly significant effects (for example, reordering how apps might appear when you visit the app store).
How we protect your information
Our teams work tirelessly to protect your information, and to ensure the security and integrity of our platform. We also have independent auditors assess the security of our data storage and systems that process financial information. However, we all know that no method of transmission over the Internet, and method of electronic storage, can be 100% secure. This means we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your personal information. You can find more information about our security measures at
/ie/security
.
How we use “cookies” and other tracking technologies
We use
cookies
and similar tracking technologies on our website and when providing our services. For more information about how we use these technologies, including a list of other companies that place cookies on our sites, a list of cookies that we place when we power a merchant’s store, and an explanation of how you can opt out of certain types of cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
How you can reach us
If you would like to ask about, make a request relating to, or complain about how we process your personal information, please contact
Shopify Support
, or mail us at one of the addresses below. If you would like to submit a legally binding request to demand someone else’s personal information (for example, if you have a subpoena or court order), please review our
Guidelines for Legal Requests
.
If you are a merchant, partner, Shop user, Shopify employee, website visitor or other individual that Shopify has a direct relationship with and you are located in the EEA or UK, Shopify International Ltd is the controller of your personal data. If you buy something from or otherwise provide your information to a Shopify-powered store, the merchant is your data controller and we are acting as a processor on their behalf.
If you have questions about how a merchant or store processes your personal information, you should contact the merchant or visit their privacy policy.
Shopify Commerce Singapore Pte. Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
77 Robinson Road,
#13-00 Robinson 77,
Singapore 068896
If you are located in the EEA, the UK, the Middle East, South America, or Africa:
Shopify International Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Intertrust Ireland
2nd Floor 1-2 Victoria Buildings
Haddington Road
Dublin 4, D04 XN32
Ireland
If you are located in Asia, Australia, or New Zealand:
Shopify Commerce Singapore Pte. Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
77 Robinson Road,
#13-00 Robinson 77,
Singapore 068896
United States Regional Privacy Notice
This United States Regional Privacy Notice (“US Notice”) supplements our Privacy Policy and all supplemental privacy policies on
www.shopify.com
(together, the “Shopify Privacy Policies”).
This US Notice is for individuals residing in certain US states and is designed to help you better understand how we collect, use, and disclose your personal information and, depending on how you use Shopify and where you reside, how to exercise available rights under various applicable privacy laws in the US, specifically the California Consumer Privacy Act, the Colorado Privacy Act, the Connecticut Act Concerning Personal Data Privacy and Online Monitoring, the Utah Consumer Privacy Act, and the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (collectively, the “US Privacy Laws”).
What information we collect and share about you
To provide our apps and services to you, we must process information about you, including personal information.
We do not “sell” your personal information as that term is defined under US Privacy Laws.
Here is a summary of the categories of personal information we may have collected about you over the past 12 months and with whom we may have disclosed that information to, depending on how you use Shopify.
Categories of personal information collected
Recipients of personal information
Identifiers, including name, email address, mailing address, phone number;
Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute, including name, mailing and billing address, phone number, credit or debit card information;
Commercial information, including products you purchase, place in your shopping cart, favorite or review (if you are a customer) and information you provide us about you and your business (if you are a merchant);
Photos and videos, which may include face imagery, if you choose to provide them.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including information regarding the device and browser you use, network connection, IP address, and how you browse through our apps and sites;
Geolocation data, including your mailing and billing address;
Inferences, or information derived from other personal information about you, which could include your preferences, interests, and other information used to personalize your experience;
Other information you provide; and
Sensitive personal information, which may include:
Government-issued identifiers, including social security, driver’s license, state identification card, or passport number;
Your account access credentials (such as account log-in, financial account, debit or credit card number in combination with any required security access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account);
Your device’s precise location (if you are a Shop App user, but only when you allow Shop to access this information);
Information you voluntarily disclose that may reveal certain characteristics about you such as your racial or ethnic origin or sexual orientation
The contents of email messages in the email inboxes that you connect to your Shop account, and information from email messages you transfer to the app to be included in your order history (if you use Shop).
Companies who help us provide you with our services, including cloud storage providers, payment processors, fulfillment partners, security vendors, email providers, marketplaces and data analytics vendors;
Advertisers and marketing vendors;
Merchants whose shops you visit or make purchases from;
Partners who provide a range of services to merchants, such as by developing apps or themes for use by merchants, serving as an affiliate that refers potential merchants to us, or helping merchants build or manage stores;
Law enforcement or other third parties in connection with legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Why we collect and share your Personal Information
We use and share your personal information for the purposes set out in the Shopify Privacy Policies. For categories of sensitive personal information that we collect, we only use or disclose such information either with your specific consent when required, or as otherwise permitted by law.
Sources of Personal Information
To make commerce better for everyone at Shopify, we collect and use personal information provided by:
You: We collect the information you provide when you use our platform, including when you sign up for Shopify as a merchant, visit a Shopify-powered store, fill in order information, visit one of Shopify’s websites or contact Shopify support. We collect account and payment information you provide to us (including information about your business if you are a merchant), Shopify stores or items you save to favorites, purchases you make, reviews you post, and how you otherwise interact or communicate with stores or other users on our apps or services. We also collect information about how you browse through our apps and sites, including search terms you may enter.
Your device(s): We collect information from and about the devices you use, including computers, phones, and other web-connected devices you use to access our apps or services, and we combine this information across different devices you use.
Third parties: We receive information from partners who help us provide you with our services including the following:
Email providers. If you use the Shop App and you connect your third party inboxes, such as Gmail or Outlook (according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law), we receive information to identify shopping-related emails and display within Shop information about specific orders you have made, stores you have engaged with in the past, and other related information.
Service Providers. We receive information from our service providers, who help us provide services to our merchants, like reviewing accounts for fraud or other concerns.
Marketplaces. If you use the Shop App, we receive information about purchases you have made from other marketplaces or platforms, such as Amazon, that you choose to connect through Shop. This information helps us to provide and improve Shop, to personalize your experience using our apps and services, and to determine if you are eligible for specific offers or payment methods.
Subprocessors. We work with third party subprocessors for cloud hosting, content delivery, data analysis, internal logging, fulfillment services and email transmission, among others, to provide you with our services. For more information, see Shopify’s subprocessors.
Analytics and cookie providers. We receive information through our use of cookies, social plugins (such as the Facebook “like” button), pixels and tags for business purposes, such as providing information to help measure how users interact with our website content. For more information about how we use these technologies, see our Cookie Policy.
How long we keep your information
Because we need your personal information to provide Shopify services, we generally keep your personal information, including sensitive personal information, while you use Shopify products or services or until you tell us to delete your information. We may also keep personal information to comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests.
If you are a merchant operating a Shopify-powered store, and you close the store, stop paying your subscription fees, or we terminate your account, we retain store information for two years before we begin the deletion process.
When you visit or make a purchase from a merchant’s Shopify-powered store, we act as a service provider or processor for the merchant, and the merchant, not Shopify, decides how long your information is retained.
Your rights over your information
Depending on where you live, how you use Shopify, and subject to certain exceptions, you may have some or all of the following rights:
Right to Know: The right to request that we disclose to you the personal information we collect, use, or disclose about you, and information about our data practices.
Right to Request Correction: The right to request that we correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you.
Right to Request Deletion: The right to request that we delete personal information that we have collected about you.
To exercise your rights, including the “right to know” and “right to delete,” please submit a request through our online portal. If you use Shop or Shop Pay, please visit
https://shop.app/delete-account
for instructions on how to request deletion of your information.
If you have visited or made a purchase from a merchant’s Shopify-powered store, please contact the specific merchant directly. If you make a request to us, we will forward your request to the relevant merchant.
Please note that to protect your information and the integrity of our products and services, we may need to verify your identity before processing your request. In some cases we may need to collect additional information to verify your identity, such as your email address or a government issued ID.
Under US Privacy Laws, you may also designate an authorized agent to make these requests on your behalf. If you use an authorized agent to submit a request, we may need to collect additional information, such as a government issued ID, to verify your identity before processing your request to protect your information.
For information on the CCPA requests we have received, please see here. In certain states, you may have the right to appeal our decision regarding a request related to these rights. If you wish to appeal a decision, please contact Shopify Support.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of these rights.
How you can reach us
If you would like to ask about or have concerns about how we process your personal information, please contact Shopify Support. If you want to make a request relating to your personal information, please contact us using the methods set out in the section immediately above.
We use cookies (and other similar technologies) for many purposes, including to improve your experience on our site and for ads and analytics. Click "Accept all" to accept these uses. Read more in our
Cookie Policy
.
Reject all
Accept all
Sub-policy 3
https://www.oaic.gov.au/privacy/privacy-complaints:
We use cookies on this site
We use cookies to analyse traffic and to improve your browsing experience on our website. To find out more, read our
privacy policy
.
Close
Skip to main content
Privacy
Privacy complaints
Privacy complaints
The
Privacy Act 1988
has strict rules about how an organisation or agency handles your personal information. If you think they’ve mishandled it, you can lodge a complaint with us.
Listen
What you can complain about
You may complain if your personal information is mishandled
How we investigate and resolve your complaint
We're an impartial third party when handling your complaint
Your complaint review rights
You have the right to appeal our decision or determination
External dispute resolution schemes
Schemes we recognise to handle privacy-related complaints
How to ...
Complain to an organisation or agency
Do this first, before complaining to us
Lodge a privacy complaint with us
You can complain to us in writing
Representative complaints
Privacy complaint: immigration data breach
Class privacy complaint against the Department of Immigration and Border Security, our notice to those affected and our determination
Representative complaint: Medibank data breach
The Information about the representative complaint against Medibank Private Limited arising out of the 2022 Medibank data breach, and our notice to those affected.
Handling of personal information by Dymocks Pty Ltd
The information about the representative complaint against Dymocks Pty Ltd resulting from a data breach in 2023
Representative complaint: handling of personal information by Ticketek Pty Ltd
Did you find this helpful?
Yes
No
We'd love to hear more!
Please tell us more
Rate your experience
We'd love to hear more about your rating
What did you come here to do?
How can we improve this information?
⨯
Share
Facebook
Twitter
Linkedin